Illinois, session 104th, SB3853.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 704A as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/704A)7    Sec. 704A. Employer's return and payment of tax withheld.8    (a) In general, every employer who deducts and withholds 9or is required to deduct and withhold tax under this Act on or 10after January 1, 2008 shall make those payments and returns as 11provided in this Section.12    (b) Returns. Every employer shall, in the form and manner 13required by the Department, make returns with respect to taxes 14withheld or required to be withheld under this Article 7 for 15each quarter beginning on or after January 1, 2008, on or 16before the last day of the first month following the close of 17that quarter.18    (c) Payments. With respect to amounts withheld or required 19to be withheld on or after January 1, 2008:20        (1) Semi-weekly payments. For each calendar year, each 21    employer who withheld or was required to withhold more 22    than $12,000 during the one-year period ending on June 30 23    of the immediately preceding calendar year, payment must   SB3853- 2 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1    be made:2            (A) on or before each Friday of the calendar year, 3        for taxes withheld or required to be withheld on the 4        immediately preceding Saturday, Sunday, Monday, or 5        Tuesday;6            (B) on or before each Wednesday of the calendar 7        year, for taxes withheld or required to be withheld on 8        the immediately preceding Wednesday, Thursday, or 9        Friday.10        Beginning with calendar year 2011, payments made under 11    this paragraph (1) of subsection (c) must be made by 12    electronic funds transfer. 13        (2) Semi-weekly payments. Any employer who withholds 14    or is required to withhold more than $12,000 in any 15    quarter of a calendar year is required to make payments on 16    the dates set forth under item (1) of this subsection (c) 17    for each remaining quarter of that calendar year and for 18    the subsequent calendar year. 19        (3) Monthly payments. Each employer, other than an 20    employer described in items (1) or (2) of this subsection, 21    shall pay to the Department, on or before the 15th day of 22    each month the taxes withheld or required to be withheld 23    during the immediately preceding month.24        (4) Payments with returns. Each employer shall pay to 25    the Department, on or before the due date for each return 26    required to be filed under this Section, any tax withheld   SB3853- 3 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1    or required to be withheld during the period for which the 2    return is due and not previously paid to the Department.3    (d) Regulatory authority. The Department may, by rule:4        (1) Permit employers, in lieu of the requirements of 5    subsections (b) and (c), to file annual returns due on or 6    before January 31 of the year for taxes withheld or 7    required to be withheld during the previous calendar year 8    and, if the aggregate amounts required to be withheld by 9    the employer under this Article 7 (other than amounts 10    required to be withheld under Section 709.5) do not exceed 11    $1,000 for the previous calendar year, to pay the taxes 12    required to be shown on each such return no later than the 13    due date for such return.14        (2) Provide that any payment required to be made under 15    subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2) is deemed to be timely to the 16    extent paid by electronic funds transfer on or before the 17    due date for deposit of federal income taxes withheld 18    from, or federal employment taxes due with respect to, the 19    wages from which the Illinois taxes were withheld.20        (3) Designate one or more depositories to which 21    payment of taxes required to be withheld under this 22    Article 7 must be paid by some or all employers.23        (4) Increase the threshold dollar amounts at which 24    employers are required to make semi-weekly payments under 25    subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2).26    (e) Annual return and payment. Every employer who deducts   SB3853- 4 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1and withholds or is required to deduct and withhold tax from a 2person engaged in domestic service employment, as that term is 3defined in Section 3510 of the Internal Revenue Code, may 4comply with the requirements of this Section with respect to 5such employees by filing an annual return and paying the taxes 6required to be deducted and withheld on or before the 15th day 7of the fourth month following the close of the employer's 8taxable year. The Department may allow the employer's return 9to be submitted with the employer's individual income tax 10return or to be submitted with a return due from the employer 11under Section 1400.2 of the Unemployment Insurance Act.12    (f) Magnetic media and electronic filing. With respect to 13taxes withheld in calendar years prior to 2017, any W-2 Form 14that, under the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 15promulgated thereunder, is required to be submitted to the 16Internal Revenue Service on magnetic media or electronically 17must also be submitted to the Department on magnetic media or 18electronically for Illinois purposes, if required by the 19Department.20    With respect to taxes withheld in 2017 and subsequent 21calendar years, the Department may, by rule, require that any 22return (including any amended return) under this Section and 23any W-2 Form that is required to be submitted to the Department 24must be submitted on magnetic media or electronically. 25    The due date for submitting W-2 Forms shall be as 26prescribed by the Department by rule.   SB3853- 5 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1    (g) For amounts deducted or withheld after December 31, 22009, a taxpayer who makes an election under subsection (f) of 3Section 5-15 of the Economic Development for a Growing Economy 4Tax Credit Act for a taxable year shall be allowed a credit 5against payments due under this Section for amounts withheld 6during the first calendar year beginning after the end of that 7taxable year equal to the amount of the credit for the 8incremental income tax attributable to full-time employees of 9the taxpayer awarded to the taxpayer by the Department of 10Commerce and Economic Opportunity under the Economic 11Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit Act for the 12taxable year and credits not previously claimed and allowed to 13be carried forward under Section 211(4) of this Act as 14provided in subsection (f) of Section 5-15 of the Economic 15Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit Act. The credit 16or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's obligation for any 17payment due under this Section to less than zero. If the amount 18of the credit or credits exceeds the total payments due under 19this Section with respect to amounts withheld during the 20calendar year, the excess may be carried forward and applied 21against the taxpayer's liability under this Section in the 22succeeding calendar years as allowed to be carried forward 23under paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. The credit or 24credits shall be applied to the earliest year for which there 25is a tax liability. If there are credits from more than one 26taxable year that are available to offset a liability, the   SB3853- 6 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1earlier credit shall be applied first. Each employer who 2deducts and withholds or is required to deduct and withhold 3tax under this Act and who retains income tax withholdings 4under subsection (f) of Section 5-15 of the Economic 5Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit Act must make a 6return with respect to such taxes and retained amounts in the 7form and manner that the Department, by rule, requires and pay 8to the Department or to a depositary designated by the 9Department those withheld taxes not retained by the taxpayer. 10For purposes of this subsection (g), the term taxpayer shall 11include taxpayer and members of the taxpayer's unitary 12business group as defined under paragraph (27) of subsection 13(a) of Section 1501 of this Act. This Section is exempt from 14the provisions of Section 250 of this Act. No credit awarded 15under the Economic Development for a Growing Economy Tax 16Credit Act for agreements entered into on or after January 1, 172015 may be credited against payments due under this Section.18    (g-1) For amounts deducted or withheld after December 31, 192024, a taxpayer who makes an election under the Reimagining 20Energy and Vehicles in Illinois Act shall be allowed a credit 21against payments due under this Section for amounts withheld 22during the first quarterly reporting period beginning after 23the certificate is issued equal to the portion of the REV 24Illinois Credit attributable to the incremental income tax 25attributable to new employees and retained employees as 26certified by the Department of Commerce and Economic   SB3853- 7 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1Opportunity pursuant to an agreement with the taxpayer under 2the Reimagining Energy and Vehicles in Illinois Act for the 3taxable year. The credit or credits may not reduce the 4taxpayer's obligation for any payment due under this Section 5to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or credits 6exceeds the total payments due under this Section with respect 7to amounts withheld during the quarterly reporting period, the 8excess may be carried forward and applied against the 9taxpayer's liability under this Section in the succeeding 10quarterly reporting period as allowed to be carried forward 11under paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. The credit or 12credits shall be applied to the earliest quarterly reporting 13period for which there is a tax liability. If there are credits 14from more than one quarterly reporting period that are 15available to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be 16applied first. Each employer who deducts and withholds or is 17required to deduct and withhold tax under this Act and who 18retains income tax withholdings this subsection must make a 19return with respect to such taxes and retained amounts in the 20form and manner that the Department, by rule, requires and pay 21to the Department or to a depositary designated by the 22Department those withheld taxes not retained by the taxpayer. 23For purposes of this subsection (g-1), the term taxpayer shall 24include taxpayer and members of the taxpayer's unitary 25business group as defined under paragraph (27) of subsection 26(a) of Section 1501 of this Act. This Section is exempt from   SB3853- 8 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1the provisions of Section 250 of this Act. 2    (g-2) For amounts deducted or withheld after December 31, 32024, a taxpayer who makes an election under the Manufacturing 4Illinois Chips for Real Opportunity (MICRO) Act shall be 5allowed a credit against payments due under this Section for 6amounts withheld during the first quarterly reporting period 7beginning after the certificate is issued equal to the portion 8of the MICRO Illinois Credit attributable to the incremental 9income tax attributable to new employees and retained 10employees as certified by the Department of Commerce and 11Economic Opportunity pursuant to an agreement with the 12taxpayer under the Manufacturing Illinois Chips for Real 13Opportunity (MICRO) Act for the taxable year. The credit or 14credits may not reduce the taxpayer's obligation for any 15payment due under this Section to less than zero. If the amount 16of the credit or credits exceeds the total payments due under 17this Section with respect to amounts withheld during the 18quarterly reporting period, the excess may be carried forward 19and applied against the taxpayer's liability under this 20Section in the succeeding quarterly reporting period as 21allowed to be carried forward under paragraph (4) of Section 22211 of this Act. The credit or credits shall be applied to the 23earliest quarterly reporting period for which there is a tax 24liability. If there are credits from more than one quarterly 25reporting period that are available to offset a liability, the 26earlier credit shall be applied first. Each employer who   SB3853- 9 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1deducts and withholds or is required to deduct and withhold 2tax under this Act and who retains income tax withholdings 3this subsection must make a return with respect to such taxes 4and retained amounts in the form and manner that the 5Department, by rule, requires and pay to the Department or to a 6depositary designated by the Department those withheld taxes 7not retained by the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection, 8the term taxpayer shall include taxpayer and members of the 9taxpayer's unitary business group as defined under paragraph 10(27) of subsection (a) of Section 1501 of this Act. This 11Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 250 of this 12Act.13    (h) An employer may claim a credit against payments due 14under this Section for amounts withheld during the first 15calendar year ending after the date on which a tax credit 16certificate was issued under Section 35 of the Small Business 17Job Creation Tax Credit Act. The credit shall be equal to the 18amount shown on the certificate, but may not reduce the 19taxpayer's obligation for any payment due under this Section 20to less than zero. If the amount of the credit exceeds the 21total payments due under this Section with respect to amounts 22withheld during the calendar year, the excess may be carried 23forward and applied against the taxpayer's liability under 24this Section in the 5 succeeding calendar years. The credit 25shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 26liability. If there are credits from more than one calendar   SB3853- 10 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1year that are available to offset a liability, the earlier 2credit shall be applied first. This Section is exempt from the 3provisions of Section 250 of this Act. 4    (i) Each employer with 50 or fewer full-time equivalent 5employees during the reporting period may claim a credit 6against the payments due under this Section for each qualified 7employee in an amount equal to the maximum credit allowable. 8The credit may be taken against payments due for reporting 9periods that begin on or after January 1, 2020, and end on or 10before December 31, 2027. An employer may not claim a credit 11for an employee who has worked fewer than 90 consecutive days 12immediately preceding the reporting period; however, such 13credits may accrue during that 90-day period and be claimed 14against payments under this Section for future reporting 15periods after the employee has worked for the employer at 16least 90 consecutive days. In no event may the credit exceed 17the employer's liability for the reporting period. Each 18employer who deducts and withholds or is required to deduct 19and withhold tax under this Act and who retains income tax 20withholdings under this subsection must make a return with 21respect to such taxes and retained amounts in the form and 22manner that the Department, by rule, requires and pay to the 23Department or to a depositary designated by the Department 24those withheld taxes not retained by the employer. 25    For each reporting period, the employer may not claim a 26credit or credits for more employees than the number of   SB3853- 11 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1employees making less than the minimum or reduced wage for the 2current calendar year during the last reporting period of the 3preceding calendar year. Notwithstanding any other provision 4of this subsection, an employer shall not be eligible for 5credits for a reporting period unless the average wage paid by 6the employer per employee for all employees making less than 7$55,000 during the reporting period is greater than the 8average wage paid by the employer per employee for all 9employees making less than $55,000 during the same reporting 10period of the prior calendar year. 11    This subsection (i) is exempt from the provisions of 12Section 250. 13    For purposes of this subsection (i): 14    "Compensation paid in Illinois" has the meaning ascribed 15to that term under Section 304(a)(2)(B) of this Act.16    "Employer" and "employee" have the meaning ascribed to 17those terms in the Minimum Wage Law, except that "employee" 18also includes employees who work for an employer with fewer 19than 4 employees. Employers that operate more than one 20establishment pursuant to a franchise agreement or that 21constitute members of a unitary business group shall aggregate 22their employees for purposes of determining eligibility for 23the credit.24    "Full-time equivalent employees" means the ratio of the 25number of paid hours during the reporting period and the 26number of working hours in that period.  SB3853- 12 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1    "Maximum credit" means the percentage listed below of the 2difference between the amount of compensation paid in Illinois 3to employees who are paid not more than the required minimum 4wage reduced by the amount of compensation paid in Illinois to 5employees who were paid less than the current required minimum 6wage during the reporting period prior to each increase in the 7required minimum wage on January 1. If an employer pays an 8employee more than the required minimum wage and that employee 9previously earned less than the required minimum wage, the 10employer may include the portion that does not exceed the 11required minimum wage as compensation paid in Illinois to 12employees who are paid not more than the required minimum 13wage. 14        (1) 25% for reporting periods beginning on or after 15    January 1, 2020 and ending on or before December 31, 2020;16        (2) 21% for reporting periods beginning on or after 17    January 1, 2021 and ending on or before December 31, 2021;18        (3) 17% for reporting periods beginning on or after 19    January 1, 2022 and ending on or before December 31, 2022;20        (4) 13% for reporting periods beginning on or after 21    January 1, 2023 and ending on or before December 31, 2023;22        (5) 9% for reporting periods beginning on or after 23    January 1, 2024 and ending on or before December 31, 2024;24        (6) 5% for reporting periods beginning on or after 25    January 1, 2025 and ending on or before December 31, 2025.26    The amount computed under this subsection may continue to   SB3853- 13 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1be claimed for reporting periods beginning on or after January 21, 2026 and: 3        (A) ending on or before December 31, 2026 for 4    employers with more than 5 employees; or5        (B) ending on or before December 31, 2027 for 6    employers with no more than 5 employees. 7    "Qualified employee" means an employee who is paid not 8more than the required minimum wage and has an average wage 9paid per hour by the employer during the reporting period 10equal to or greater than his or her average wage paid per hour 11by the employer during each reporting period for the 12immediately preceding 12 months. A new qualified employee is 13deemed to have earned the required minimum wage in the 14preceding reporting period.15    "Reporting period" means the quarter for which a return is 16required to be filed under subsection (b) of this Section. 17    (j) For reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 182023, if a private employer grants all of its employees the 19option of taking a paid leave of absence of at least 30 days 20for the purpose of serving as an organ donor or bone marrow 21donor, then the private employer may take a credit against the 22payments due under this Section in an amount equal to the 23amount withheld under this Section with respect to wages paid 24while the employee is on organ donation leave, not to exceed 25$1,000 in withholdings for each employee who takes organ 26donation leave. To be eligible for the credit, such a leave of   SB3853- 14 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1absence must be taken without loss of pay, vacation time, 2compensatory time, personal days, or sick time for at least 3the first 30 days of the leave of absence. The private employer 4shall adopt rules governing organ donation leave, including 5rules that (i) establish conditions and procedures for 6requesting and approving leave and (ii) require medical 7documentation of the proposed organ or bone marrow donation 8before leave is approved by the private employer. A private 9employer must provide, in the manner required by the 10Department, documentation from the employee's medical 11provider, which the private employer receives from the 12employee, that verifies the employee's organ donation. The 13private employer must also provide, in the manner required by 14the Department, documentation that shows that a qualifying 15organ donor leave policy was in place and offered to all 16qualifying employees at the time the leave was taken. For the 17private employer to receive the tax credit, the employee 18taking organ donor leave must allow for the applicable medical 19records to be disclosed to the Department. If the private 20employer cannot provide the required documentation to the 21Department, then the private employer is ineligible for the 22credit under this Section. A private employer must also 23provide, in the form required by the Department, any 24additional documentation or information required by the 25Department to administer the credit under this Section. The 26credit under this subsection (j) shall be taken within one   SB3853- 15 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1year after the date upon which the organ donation leave 2begins. If the leave taken spans into a second tax year, the 3employer qualifies for the allowable credit in the later of 4the 2 years. If the amount of credit exceeds the tax liability 5for the year, the excess may be carried and applied to the tax 6liability for the 3 taxable years following the excess credit 7year. The tax credit shall be applied to the earliest year for 8which there is a tax liability. If there are credits for more 9than one year that are available to offset liability, the 10earlier credit shall be applied first. 11    Nothing in this subsection (j) prohibits a private 12employer from providing an unpaid leave of absence to its 13employees for the purpose of serving as an organ donor or bone 14marrow donor; however, if the employer's policy provides for 15fewer than 30 days of paid leave for organ or bone marrow 16donation, then the employer shall not be eligible for the 17credit under this Section. 18    As used in this subsection (j):19    "Organ" means any biological tissue of the human body that 20may be donated by a living donor, including, but not limited 21to, the kidney, liver, lung, pancreas, intestine, bone, skin, 22or any subpart of those organs. 23    "Organ donor" means a person from whose body an organ is 24taken to be transferred to the body of another person. 25    "Private employer" means a sole proprietorship, 26corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other   SB3853- 16 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1entity with one or more employees. "Private employer" does not 2include a municipality, county, State agency, or other public 3employer. 4    This subsection (j) is exempt from the provisions of 5Section 250 of this Act.6    (k) For reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 72025 and before January 1, 2027, an employer may claim a credit 8against payments due under this Section for amounts withheld 9during the first reporting period to occur after the date on 10which a tax credit certificate is issued for a non-profit 11theater production under Section 10 of the Live Theater 12Production Tax Credit Act. The credit shall be equal to the 13amount shown on the certificate, but may not reduce the 14taxpayer's obligation for any payment due under this Article 15to less than zero. If the amount of the credit exceeds the 16total amount due under this Article with respect to amounts 17withheld during the first reporting period to occur after the 18date on which a tax credit certificate is issued, the excess 19may be carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's 20liability under this Section for reporting periods that occur 21in the 5 succeeding calendar years. The excess credit shall be 22applied to the earliest reporting period for which there is a 23payment due under this Article. If there are credits from more 24than one reporting period that are available to offset a 25liability, the earlier credit shall be applied first. The 26Department of Revenue, in cooperation with the Department of   SB3853- 17 -LRB104 17145 HLH 30564 b1Commerce and Economic Opportunity, shall adopt rules to 2enforce and administer the provisions of this subsection. 3    (l) A taxpayer who is issued a certificate under the Local 4Journalism Sustainability Act for a taxable year shall be 5allowed a credit against payments due under this Section as 6provided in that Act. 7(Source: P.A. 103-592, Article 40, Section 40-900, eff. 86-7-24; 103-592, Article 45, Section 45-10, eff. 6-7-24; 9104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.